Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.480

Educational materials regarding best practices for avoiding adverse effects from pesticides on pollinating insects.

The department must develop educational materials regarding the best practices for avoiding adverse effects from pesticides on populations of bees, honey bees, and other pollinating insects. The educational materials must include, but not be limited to, measures that anyone applying pesticides can take to protect bees, honey bees, and other pollinating insects. The department must design requirements to ensure that any pesticide applicator applying or supervising the application of a restricted-use pesticide is highly knowledgeable regarding alternatives to, the appropriateness of, and precautions for, the use of restricted-use pesticides that may be injurious to the health of bees, honey bees, and other pollinating insects.

[ 2019 c 353 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 353: See note following RCW 43.23.300.